Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB730.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13A62(b)(3) of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 13A62. Table game taxes.* * *(b) Deposits and distributions.--* * *(3) [The] Notwithstanding section 2502.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, or any other provision of law, the tax imposed under subsection (a) shall be deposited into the [General Fund] Property Tax Relief Fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617